Maryland, session 2025, HB0050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
14.5–1003.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SPOUSE” MEANS THE INDIVIDUAL TO WHOM AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO CREATED A TRUST WAS MARRIED AT THE TIME THE TRUST WAS
CREATED.
[(a)] (B) An individual who creates a trust may not be considered the settlor of
that trust with regard to the individual’s interest in the trust if:
(1) That interest is the authority of the trustee under the trust instrument
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0050*

HOUSE BILL 50
or any other provision of law to pay or reimburse the individual for any tax on trust income
or trust principal that is payable by the individual under the law imposing that tax; [or]
(2) All of the following apply:
(i) The individual creates or has created the trust for the benefit of
the individual’s spouse;
(ii) The trust is treated as qualified terminable interest property
under § 2523(f) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and
(iii) The individual’s interest in the trust income, trust principal, or
both follows the termination of the spouse’s prior interest in the trust; OR
(3) ALL OF THE FOLLOWING APPLY:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL CREATES OR HAS CREATED THE TRUST:
1. FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S SPOUSE
DURING THE LIFETIME OF THE SPOUSE; OR
2. FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S SPOUSE AND
ANY OTHER BENEFICIARY DURING THE LIFETIME OF THE SPOUSE;
(II) THE TRUST DOES NOT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF ITEM
(2) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(III) THE TRUST IS IRREVOCABLE; AND
(IV) AFTER THE DEATH OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S SPOUSE, THE
INDIVIDUAL IS A BENEFICIARY OF THE TRUST THROUGH THE EXERCISE OF A POWER
OF APPOINTMENT BY THE INDIVIDUAL’S SPOUSE OR BY ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL WHO
DID NOT CREATE THE TRUST.
[(b)] (C) A creditor of an individual described in subsection [(a)] (B) of this
section may not attach, exercise, reach, or otherwise compel distribution of:
(1) Any principal or income of the trust;
(2) Any principal or income of any other trust to the extent that the
property held in the other trust is attributable to a trust described in subsection [(a)(2)]
(B)(2) OR (3) of this section;
(3) The individual’s interest in the trust; or

HOUSE BILL 50 3
(4) The individual’s interest in any other trust to the extent that the
property held in the other trust is attributable to a trust described in subsection [(a)(2)]
(B)(2) OR (3) of this section.
[(c)] (D) This section may not be construed to affect any State law with respect
to a fraudulent transfer by an individual to a trustee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.